Connecticut, session 2026, SB00415.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 13b-116 of the general statutes is amended by
2 adding subdivisions (8) to (11), inclusive, as follows (Effective October 1,
3 2026):
4 (NEW) (8) "Telemetric monitoring" means the continuous, automated
5 collection and evaluation of operational and system performance data
6 that is generated by a digital network during a prearranged ride.
7 (NEW) (9) "Safety anomaly" means an unexpected or irregular event
8 detected through a digital network that deviates from performance
9 baselines established by a transportation network company that may
10 indicate a potential risk to the safety of a rider or driver, including, but
11 not limited to, high-force decelerations or structural vibrations
12 consistent with a motor vehicle accident, significant departures from the
13 path of the prearranged ride or prolonged periods of inactivity on the
14 digital network.
15 (NEW) (10) "Sexual assault" has the same meaning as provided in
16 section 10a-55m.
17 (NEW) (11) "Serious physical injury" has the same meaning as
LCO 1 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 415
18 provided in section 53a-3.
19 Sec. 2. Subsection (a) of section 13b-118 of the 2026 supplement to the
20 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
21 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
22 (a) (1) A transportation network company shall provide for real-time
23 messaging between the company and the transportation network
24 company driver through the company's digital network when the driver
25 is using the digital network. Such messaging shall be available in both
26 English and Spanish.
27 (2) After a potential transportation network company rider submits a
28 request for a prearranged ride, the transportation network company
29 shall display to the rider through its digital network: [a] (A) A picture
30 of the transportation network company driver and the license plate
31 number of the transportation network company vehicle that will be
32 used to provide the prearranged ride before the rider enters such
33 vehicle, and (B) a notification identifying any safety features available
34 through the digital network that may be used during a prearranged
35 ride. Each transportation network company shall, at a minimum,
36 provide the following safety features: (i) A location sharing feature that
37 allows a rider to share information about a prearranged ride with a third
38 party, (ii) an emergency assistance interface or other means to contact a
39 public safety answering point, as defined in section 28-25, during a
40 prearranged ride, (iii) an optional audio recording feature that may be
41 utilized during a prearranged ride, provided such feature includes
42 notice to the driver and is implemented in compliance with applicable
43 state and federal laws governing the recording of communications, and
44 (iv) the availability of support and resources twenty-four hours a day to
45 manage any incidents, accidents or emergencies that occur during a
46 prearranged ride.
47 (3) On each offer for a prearranged ride presented to a transportation
48 network company driver, the transportation network company shall
49 display through its digital network on any such offer whether the
LCO 2 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 415
50 potential transportation network company rider requesting such
51 prearranged ride, or the third party requesting a prearranged ride on
52 behalf of a potential rider, has been verified by the company. The
53 company shall designate an individual as verified if the company has
54 authenticated the individual's identity through the submission of a valid
55 photograph, the comparison of the individual's account information
56 with records maintained by another party or any other method that
57 reasonably enables the company to confirm the identity of the
58 individual. A driver's decision to decline an offer for a prearranged ride
59 where the potential rider or requesting third party is not designated as
60 verified shall not, by itself, constitute grounds for suspension,
61 deactivation or other disciplinary action against the driver by the
62 company.
63 [(3)] (4) A transportation network company driver shall display on a
64 transportation network company vehicle a removable decal at all times
65 when the driver is connected to a digital network or is engaged in the
66 provision of a prearranged ride. Such decal shall be: (A) Issued by the
67 transportation network company; (B) sufficiently large so as to be
68 readable during daylight hours at a distance of at least fifty feet; (C)
69 reflective, illuminated or otherwise visible in darkness; and (D)
70 displayed on the passenger side of the transportation network company
71 vehicle if such decal is illuminated.
72 (5) A transportation network company shall, through its digital
73 network, (A) implement and maintain a telemetric monitoring system
74 capable of providing an emergency assistance interface with the
75 opportunity to contact a public safety answering point, and (B) permit a
76 third party pursuant to an agreement with such company to receive,
77 review and respond in real time to notifications generated by the digital
78 network relating to a safety anomaly occurring during a prearranged
79 ride.
80 Sec. 3. Section 13b-119 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
81 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
82 October 1, 2026):
LCO 3 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 415
83 (a) Prior to permitting an individual to act as a transportation
84 network company driver on its digital network, the transportation
85 network company shall:
86 (1) Require the individual to submit an application to the company
87 that includes (A) information regarding the individual's name, address,
88 date of birth, motor vehicle operator's license number and motor vehicle
89 registration, and (B) a written statement that discloses whether the
90 individual has ever been suspended or permanently banned from
91 accessing a digital network by a transportation network company in
92 relation to any allegation of sexual assault or assault resulting in another
93 person's death or serious physical injury that was connected to the
94 driver's use of such digital network;
95 (2) (A) Conduct, or have a consumer reporting agency regulated
96 under the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act conduct, a driving record
97 check and a local, state and national criminal history records check,
98 including a search of state and national sexual offender registry
99 databases provided such databases are accessible to the public, or (B)
100 arrange for the fingerprinting of the individual to be submitted to the
101 Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history records
102 check and to the State Police Bureau of Identification for a state criminal
103 history records check conducted in accordance with section 29-17a;
104 (3) Disclose to such individual, electronically or in writing, (A) the
105 insurance coverage, including the types of coverage and any coverage
106 limits, that the company provides while a transportation network
107 company driver is connected to the company's digital network or is
108 engaged in the provision of a prearranged ride, and (B) that a
109 transportation network company driver's personal automobile
110 insurance policy might not provide coverage while such driver is
111 connected to the company's digital network, available to receive a
112 request for a prearranged ride or engaged in the provision of a
113 prearranged ride; and
114 (4) Inform such individual, electronically or in writing, (A) that such
LCO 4 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 415
115 individual may enroll in the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance
116 Program pursuant to section 31-49m and obtain information about such
117 program from the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Authority
118 established in section 31-49f, (B) of the requirements to become qualified
119 to provide prearranged rides that originate in a neighboring state, and
120 (C) of the transportation network company's deactivation process for
121 transportation network company drivers. For the purposes of this
122 subdivision, "deactivation process" means procedures a transportation
123 network company undertakes to materially restrict a transportation
124 network company driver's access to the digital network, including
125 blocking access to the digital network, suspending a driver from the
126 digital network or changing a driver's status on the digital network from
127 eligible to provide prearranged rides to ineligible to provide
128 prearranged rides.
129 (b) (1) A transportation network company shall conduct, or have a
130 consumer reporting agency regulated under the federal Fair Credit
131 Reporting Act conduct, a local, state and national criminal history
132 records check, including a search of state and national sexual offender
133 registry databases, or arrange for the fingerprinting of the individual to
134 be submitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national
135 criminal history records check and to the State Police Bureau of
136 Identification for a state criminal history records check conducted in
137 accordance with section 29-17a, at least once every [three years] year
138 after permitting an individual to act as a transportation network
139 company driver.
140 (2) A transportation network company shall provide, and require
141 each transportation network company driver to complete, an annual
142 training concerning sexual assault prevention and driver education.
143 Such training shall include information regarding the prevention,
144 identification and reporting of sexual assault and instruction regarding
145 appropriate interactions with transportation network company riders.
146 (c) (1) No transportation network company shall permit an individual
147 to act as a transportation network company driver on its digital network
LCO 5 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 415
148 if such individual: (A) Has, during the three years prior to the date of
149 such individual's application to be a transportation network company
150 driver, (i) committed more than three moving violations, as defined in
151 section 14-111g, (ii) committed one serious traffic violation, as defined
152 in section 14-1, or (iii) had his or her motor vehicle operator's license
153 suspended pursuant to section 14-227b; (B) has been convicted, within
154 seven years prior to the date of such individual's application, of driving
155 under the influence of drugs or alcohol, fraud, sexual offenses, use of a
156 motor vehicle to commit a felony, acts of violence or acts of terror; (C) is
157 included in the state sexual offenders registry or the United States
158 Department of Justice National Sex Offender Public Website; (D) does
159 not possess a Connecticut motor vehicle operator's license or a motor
160 vehicle operator's license issued by a reciprocal state; (E) does not
161 possess proof of registration for each motor vehicle such individual
162 proposes to use as a transportation network company vehicle; [or] (F) is
163 not at least nineteen years of age; or (G) fails to submit to a periodic
164 identity verification when requested by the transportation network
165 company through its digital network when such driver is connected to
166 and active on the digital network. For the purposes of this subsection,
167 "reciprocal state" means a state that permits transportation network
168 company drivers who possess a Connecticut motor vehicle operator's
169 license to provide a prearranged ride that originates in such state.
170 (2) An individual who is permitted to act as a transportation network
171 company driver shall report to the transportation network company not
172 later than twenty-four hours after the occurrence of any of the following:
173 (A) The commission of a fourth moving violation, as defined in section
174 14-111g, during the past three years; (B) the commission of one serious
175 traffic violation, as defined in section 14-1; (C) the suspension of his or
176 her motor vehicle operator's license pursuant to section 14-227b; (D) the
177 conviction of driving under the influence of drugs or alcohol, fraud,
178 sexual offenses, use of a motor vehicle to commit a felony, acts of
179 violence or acts of terror; (E) inclusion in the state sexual offenders
180 registry or the United States Department of Justice National Sex
181 Offender Public Website; (F) failure to possess an operator's license; or
LCO 6 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 415
182 (G) failure to possess proof of registration for a transportation network
183 company vehicle. Each transportation network company that receives a
184 report pursuant to this subdivision or becomes aware of such
185 occurrence shall prohibit the individual from acting as a transportation
186 network company driver on the company's digital network until the
187 individual meets the qualifications of this section to be a transportation
188 network company driver.
189 (3) Not later than five days after a transportation network company
190 permanently bans a transportation network company driver's access to
191 the company's digital network due to a sexual assault or assault
192 resulting in another person's death or serious physical injury that was
193 connected to the driver's use of such digital network, such
194 transportation network company shall notify, or cause to be notified,
195 each registered transportation network company in the state of such ban
196 and the driver's first and last name, date of birth and motor vehicle
197 operator's license number.
198 (d) (1) A transportation network company shall adopt a policy that a
199 transportation network company driver shall not use or be under the
200 influence of drugs or alcohol while the driver is connected to the
201 company's digital network or engaged in the provision of a prearranged
202 ride. The company shall provide notice of such policy on its Internet
203 web site, and include procedures for a transportation network company
204 rider to report a complaint about a driver whom the rider reasonably
205 suspects was using or under the influence of drugs or alcohol while
206 engaged in the provision of a prearranged ride.
207 (2) Upon the company's receipt of a complaint by a rider alleging a
208 violation of such policy, the company shall suspend the driver's access
209 to the company's digital network as soon as possible and conduct an
210 investigation into the reported incident. The suspension shall last until
211 completion of the investigation. If the investigation confirms the driver
212 used or was under the influence of drugs or alcohol while engaged in
213 the provision of a prearranged ride or while connected to the company's
214 digital network, the company shall ban the driver's access to the digital
LCO 7 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 415
215 network on a permanent basis.
216 (3) The company shall maintain all records related to the enforcement
217 of such policy for a period of not less than three years from the date that
218 a complaint by a rider is received by the company.
219 (e) A transportation network company shall adopt a policy that
220 prohibits a transportation network company driver from providing a
221 prearranged ride when such driver's ability to operate a transportation
222 network company motor vehicle is impaired by illness, fatigue or any
223 other condition that would likely preclude safe operation of such
224 vehicle.
225 (f) A transportation network company driver shall: (1) Comply with
226 all applicable laws regarding nondiscrimination against transportation
227 network company riders or potential transportation network company
228 riders on the basis of age, color, creed, destination, intellectual or
229 physical disability, national origin, race, sex, sexual orientation or
230 gender identity; (2) comply with all applicable laws relating to the
231 accommodation of service animals and accommodate service animals
232 without imposing additional charges for such accommodation; (3)
233 comply with the policies adopted by the transportation network
234 company pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of section 13b-118
235 and subsections (d) and (e) of this section; (4) not impose additional
236 charges for providing prearranged rides to persons with physical
237 disabilities because of such disabilities; and (5) not solicit or accept a
238 request for transportation unless the request is accepted through the
239 transportation network company's digital network. The Commissioner
240 of Transportation may, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing
241 pursuant to the provisions of chapter 54, impose a civil penalty of not
242 more than two hundred fifty dollars on any transportation network
243 company for each instance in which a driver using such company's
244 digital network fails to accommodate a potential rider accompanied by
245 a service animal. For the purposes of this subsection, "service animal"
246 has the same meaning as provided in section 22-345.
LCO 8 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 415
247 (g) (1) Any person who holds himself or herself out to be a
248 transportation network company driver who is not permitted by a
249 transportation network company to use its digital network shall be
250 guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
251 (2) The state shall remit to a municipality fifty per cent of the fine
252 amount received for a violation of subdivision (1) of this subsection with
253 respect to each summons issued by such municipality. Each clerk of the
254 Superior Court or the Chief Court Administrator, or any other official of
255 the Superior Court designated by the Chief Court Administrator, shall,
256 on or before the thirtieth day of January, April, July and October in each
257 year, certify to the Comptroller the amount due for the previous quarter
258 under this subsection to each municipality served by the office of the
259 clerk or official.
260 (h) (1) A transportation network company vehicle shall (A) have four
261 doors; (B) not be older than twelve model years old; and (C) be designed
262 to transport no more than eight passengers, including the driver.
263 (2) Before any motor vehicle is used by a transportation network
264 company driver as a transportation network company vehicle, and
265 every two years thereafter, the driver shall certify to the transportation
266 network company that the following equipment is in good working
267 order: (A) Foot brakes; (B) emergency brakes; (C) steering mechanism;
268 (D) windshield; (E) rear window and other glass; (F) windshield wipers;
269 (G) headlights; (H) tail lights; (I) turn indicator lights; (J) brake lights;
270 (K) front seat adjustment mechanism; (L) doors; (M) horn; (N)
271 speedometer; (O) bumpers; (P) muffler and exhaust system; (Q)
272 condition of tires, including tread depth; (R) interior and exterior
273 rearview mirrors; and (S) seat safety belts and air bags for driver and
274 passengers. The transportation network company shall maintain such
275 certification for not less than three years.
276 Sec. 4. Subsection (e) of section 13b-117 of the 2026 supplement to the
277 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
278 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
LCO 9 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 415
279 (e) Not later than [January 1, 2026] February 1, 2027, and annually
280 thereafter, each transportation network company registered in the state
281 shall submit a report to the Commissioner of Transportation, in a form
282 and manner prescribed by the commissioner. Each such report shall use
283 aggregate data from the preceding year and include the following
284 information: (1) The average fare collected from transportation network
285 company riders, (2) the total time transportation network company
286 drivers spent providing prearranged rides, and (3) the total
287 compensation paid to transportation network company drivers for the
288 provision of prearranged rides.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 13b-116(8) to (11)
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 13b-118(a)
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 13b-119
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 13b-117(e)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 2(a)(2)(B), "Such safety features shall include, but need not be
limited to," was changed to "Each transportation network company
shall, at a minimum, provide the following safety features:" for clarity.
TRA Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 10 of 10